Hawaii, session 2025, GM1181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Mila Microchip Identification Act".
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that since January 1,
2022, all cat and dog owners in Hawaii have been required to
have a microchip implanted in their pet and to register that
microchip number and the owner's contact information with a
microchip registration company. The legislature further finds
that when employees of the state and county agencies responsible
for disposing roadkill pick up dead cats and dogs that have been
killed on public roadways, they do not routinely scan the
deceased animals for microchips or take any other measures to
ascertain the animal's owner. As a result, owners of lost cats
or dogs are not informed if their pet has been killed by a
vehicle.
The legislature further finds that the tragic incident
involving a dog named Mila, as reported by KITV News on
November 8, 2024, highlights a critical gap in existing policies
2025-3282 HB667 CDl HMSO
iniMiHiniliili

Page 2 H.B. NO. "
h

C.D. 1
and procedures. Due to the absence of proper scanning equipment
within the department of transportation and the lack of clear
rules for owner notification, Mila was disposed of without her
owner being informed. This measure seeks to address such
deficiencies by establishing clear directives for notification
and the use of scanning equipment to prevent similar occurrences
in the future.
Furthermore, the legislature recognizes that this measure
aligns with the intent expressed in the previous legislative
session through House Concurrent Resolution No. 171 and House
Resolution No. 150. By enacting this legislation, the
legislature affirms its commitment to animal welfare and
responsible procedures for handling lost or deceased pets.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Require the department of transportation and each
county to:
(A) Scan any cat or dog carcass found on a state or
county roadway for a microchip;
(B) Record certain information and report that
information to the appropriate county animal
services or animal service contractors; and
2025-3282 HB667 CDl HMSO

iiviiiiiiiinoiiiiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) Make reasonable efforts to contact the registered
owner; and
(2) Authorize the department of transportation and each
county to coordinate with each other to share scanner
resources or protocols.
SECTION 3. Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§264- Microchip scanning of deceased, animals on
roadways. (a) The department of transportation shall:
(1) Scan any cat or dog carcass found on a state roadway
for a microchip;
(2) Record any microchip number or other identifying
information and a basic description of the animal, if
discernible;
(3) Notify the appropriate county animal services
contractor or animal control agency within forty-eight
hours of discovery; and
(4) When feasible, make reasonable efforts to contact the
registered owner of a deceased animal if microchip
information is obtained.
2025-3282 HB667 GDI HMSO 3

Page 4 667
H.B. NO
H.D, 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(b) The department of transportation may coordinate with
the counties to share microchip scanner resources or protocols
as needed."
SECTION 4. Chapter 265A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is .
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows;
"§265A- Microchip scanning of deceased animals on
roadways. (a) Each county shall:
(1) Scan any cat or dog carcass found on a county roadway
for a microchip;
(2) Record any microchip number or other identifying
information and a basic description of the animal, if
discernible; and
(3) Notify the appropriate county animal services
contractor or animal control agency within forty-eight
hours of discovery.
(b) A county animal services contractor or animal control
agency shall make reasonable efforts to contact the registered
owner of a deceased animal if microchip information is obtained.
2025-3282 HB667 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
'^0 1
C.D. 1
(c) Each county may coordinate with the department of
transportation or other counties to share scanner resources or
protocols."
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3282 HB667 CDl HMSO
IHMIIHHH

667
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 667, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 667, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
212